New Jersey, session 222, A4026.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2025, c.74, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, there are appropriated from the General Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 10 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE 40 Community Development and Environmental Management 49 Agricultural Resources, Planning, and Regulation DIRECT STATE SERVICES 06-3360 Marketing and Development Services $500,000 Direct State Services: 06 Jersey Fresh Program ($500,000) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.